Connecticut, session 2026, SB00264.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Children and
2 Families shall conduct a study to determine whether policy and
3 procedural changes within the Department of Children and Families
4 may improve the well-being of children in the care and custody of the
5 commissioner. The commissioner shall report, in accordance with the
6 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, the findings of such
7 study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
8 cognizance of matters relating to children on or before January 1, 2027.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
KID Joint Favorable
SB264 / File No. 18 1

SB264 File No. 18
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Department of Children and Families (DCF) to
conduct a study which results in no fiscal impact, as it is anticipated
DCF has the necessary expertise to do so.
SB264 / File No. 18 2

SB264 File No. 18
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 264
AN ACT CONCERNING CHILDREN'S WELL-BEING.